Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB449.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any employer who misclassifies an employee as an independent contractor and
thereby pays less than wages and overtime compensation to which the employee is
entitled under this chapter shall be liable:
(a) To the misclassified employee for the full amount of the wages and overtime
compensation, less any amount actually paid to the employee by the
employer;
(b) To the misclassified employee for an additional sum of the full amount of
wages and overtime compensation owed to the employee as liquidated
damages; and
(c) For the misclassified employee's court costs and reasonable attorney's fees,
as may be allowed by the court.
(2) An employee who alleges he or she has been misclassified as an independent
contractor may bring a private action or may request the commissioner take an
assignment of the wage claim to bring any legal action necessary on behalf of the
employee to collect wages owed. The employer shall pay the commissioner any
costs and reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court. Employees of
the same employer may elect to join their claims in a collective action.
Section 2. KRS 337.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workplace
Standards under the direction and supervision of the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(b) "Department" means the Department of Workplace Standards in the
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1792
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(c) 1. "Wages" includes any compensation due to an employee by reason of
his or her employment, including salaries, commissions, vested vacation
pay, overtime pay, severance or dismissal pay, earned bonuses, and any
other similar advantages agreed upon by the employer and the employee
or provided to employees as an established policy. The wages shall be
payable in legal tender of the United States, checks on banks, direct
deposits, or payroll card accounts convertible into cash on demand at
full face value, subject to the allowances made in this chapter. However,
an employee may not be charged an activation fee and the payroll card
account shall provide the employee with the ability, without charge, to
make at least one (1) withdrawal per pay period for any amount up to
and including the full account balance.
2. For the purposes of calculating hourly wage rates for scheduled
overtime for professional firefighters, as defined in KRS 95A.210(8),
"wages" shall not include the distribution to qualified professional
firefighters by local governments of supplements received from the
Firefighters Foundation Program Fund. For the purposes of calculating
hourly wage rates for unscheduled overtime for professional firefighters,
as defined in KRS 95A.210(9), "wages" shall include the distribution to
qualified professional firefighters by local governments of supplements
received from the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund;
(d) "Employer" is any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency,
or firm who employs an employee and includes any person, either individual,
corporation, partnership, agency, or firm acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of an employer in relation to an employee;[ and]
(e) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1792
an employer, except that:
1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee
nor a franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisor for any purpose under this chapter; and
2. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor
nor a franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisee for any purpose under this chapter.
For purposes of this paragraph, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1;
(f) "Independent contractor" is any person employed by or permitted to work
for an employer, so long as the person:
1. Is free from the control and direction of the employer in connection
with the performance of the work, both under the contract for the
performance of the work and in fact;
2. Performs work that is outside the usual course of the employer's
business; and
3. Is customarily engaged in an independently established trade,
occupation, or business of the same nature as the work being
performed for the employer; and
(g) "Misclassified" means having been incorrectly identified as an independent
contractor and not an employee.
(2) As used in KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, and 337.385 to 337.405, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(a) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, but shall not include:
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1792
1. Any individual employed in agriculture;
2. Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative,
supervisory, or professional capacity, or in the capacity of outside
salesman, or as an outside collector as the terms are defined by
administrative regulations of the commissioner;
3. Any individual employed by the United States;
4. Any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private
home. The provisions of this section shall include individuals employed
in domestic service in or about the home of an employer where there is
more than one (1) domestic servant regularly employed;
5. Any individual classified and given a certificate by the commissioner
showing a status of learner, apprentice, worker with a disability,
sheltered workshop employee, and student under administrative
procedures and administrative regulations prescribed and promulgated
by the commissioner. This certificate shall authorize employment at the
wages, less than the established fixed minimum fair wage rates, and for
the period of time fixed by the commissioner and stated in the certificate
issued to the person;
6. Employees of retail stores, service industries, hotels, motels, and
restaurant operations whose average annual gross volume of sales made
for business done is less than ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) for
the five (5) preceding years exclusive of excise taxes at the retail level
or if the employee is the parent, spouse, child, or other member of his or
her employer's immediate family;
7. Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in an employer's home, or an
individual employed as a companion by a sick, convalescing, or elderly
person or by the person's immediate family, to care for that sick,
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1792
convalescing, or elderly person and whose principal duties do not
include housekeeping;
8. Any individual engaged in the delivery of newspapers to the consumer;
9. Any individual subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 7, 16, 27A,
30A, and 18A provided that the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall
have the authority to prescribe by administrative regulation those
emergency employees, or others, who shall receive overtime pay rates
necessary for the efficient operation of government and the protection of
affected employees;
10. Any employee employed by an establishment which is an organized
nonprofit camp, religious, or nonprofit educational conference center, if
it does not operate for more than two hundred ten (210) days in any
calendar year;
11. Any employee whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care on the employer's premises in a parental role to children
who are primarily dependent, neglected, and abused and who are in the
care of private, nonprofit childcaring facilities licensed by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services under KRS 199.640 to 199.670;
12. Any individual whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care in his or her own home as a family caregiver, family
home provider, or adult foster care provider and who is approved to
provide family caregiver services to an adult with a disability through a
contractual relationship with a community board for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability established under KRS
210.370 to 210.460 or through a contractual relationship with a certified
waiver provider as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), or is certified or
licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide adult
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1792
foster care;
13. A direct seller as defined in Section 3508(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986;
14. Any individual whose function is to provide behavior support services,
behavior programming services, case management services, community
living support services, positive behavior support services, or respite
services through a contractual relationship with a certified waiver
provider, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), pursuant to a 1915(c)
home and community based services waiver program, as defined in 907
KAR 7:005 sec. 1(2); or
15. Any individual employed to play baseball who is compensated pursuant
to the terms of a contract and a collective bargaining agreement that
expressly provides for wages and working conditions;
(b) "Agriculture" means farming in all its branches, including cultivation and
tillage of the soil; dairying; production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting
of any agricultural or horticultural commodity; raising of livestock, bees,
furbearing animals, or poultry; and any practice, including any forestry or
lumbering operations, performed on a farm in conjunction with farming
operations, including preparation and delivery of produce to storage, to
market, or to carriers for transportation to market;
(c) "Gratuity" means voluntary monetary contribution received by an employee
from a guest, patron, or customer for services rendered;
(d) "Tipped employee" means any employee engaged in an occupation in which
he or she customarily and regularly receives more than thirty dollars ($30) per
month in tips; and
(e) "U.S.C." means the United States Code.
Section 3. The following KRS section is repealed:
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1792
336.137 Marketplace contractor not an employee of a marketplace platform --
Conditions -- Exclusion from application of section.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed